Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.010

Abusing or insulting teachers, liability for—Penalty.

Any person who shall insult or abuse a teacher anywhere on the school premises while such teacher is carrying out his or her official duties, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, the penalty for which shall be a fine of not less than ten dollars nor more than one hundred dollars.

[ 1990 c 33 s 536; 1984 c 258 s 314; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 55; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 360 s 11; RRS s 5054; prior: 1903 c 156 s 11; 1897 c 118 s 169; 1890 p 383 s 86. Formerly RCW 28A.87.010, 28.87.010.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.